New York, session 2025-2026, A8033.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6206 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 4 board of trustees shall update course curriculum as necessary to require 5 senior colleges and community colleges within the city university 6 include, within all education programs for teachers, administrators and 7 counselors, the topics of local, state and national immigration policy 8 and immigrant integration and how to best educate immigrant-origin 9 students with different status in ways that promote diversity, equity 10 and inclusion, and are multilingual. 11 As used in this subdivision: 12 a. "diversity, equity and inclusion" includes, but is not limited to, 13 cultural sensitivity, and awareness of conscious and unconscious biases; 14 and 15 b. "multilingual" means that the person speaks or understands a 16 language other than English and possibly speaks or understands little or 17 no English, and may require support in order to become proficient in 18 English. 19 § 2. Section 355 of the education law is amended by adding a new 20 subdivision 2-b to read as follows: 21 2-b. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 22 state university trustees shall update course curriculum as necessary to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02954-01-5 A. 8033 2 1 require state universities or colleges to include, within all education 2 programs for teachers, administrators and counselors, the topics of 3 local, state and national immigration policy and immigrant integration 4 and how to best educate immigrant-origin students with different status 5 in ways that promote diversity, equity and inclusion, and are multilin- 6 gual. 7 As used in this subdivision: 8 a. "diversity, equity and inclusion" includes, but is not limited to, 9 cultural sensitivity, and awareness of conscious and unconscious biases; 10 and 11 b. "multilingual" means that the person speaks or understands a 12 language other than English and possibly speaks or understands little or 13 no English, and may require support in order to become proficient in 14 English. 15 § 3. The education law is amended by adding a new section 815-a to 16 read as follows: 17 § 815-a. Immigration and immigrant integration education. Notwith- 18 standing any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the trustees or 19 other governing board of each independent non-profit college which main- 20 tains a campus or other property for educational purposes chartered by 21 the regents or incorporated by special act of the legislature shall 22 update course curriculum as necessary to require within all education 23 programs for teachers, administrators and counselors, topics of local, 24 state and national immigration policy and immigrant integration and how 25 to best educate immigrant-origin students with different status in ways 26 that promote diversity, equity and inclusion, and are multilingual. 27 As used in this subdivision: 28 1. "diversity, equity and inclusion" includes, but is not limited to, 29 cultural sensitivity, and awareness of conscious and unconscious biases; 30 and 31 2. "multilingual" means that the person speaks or understands a 32 language other than English and possibly speaks or understands little or 33 no English, and may require support in order to become proficient in 34 English. 35 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.